Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.01.020

Noncharter code city.

A noncharter code city is one, regardless of population, which has initially incorporated as a noncharter code city, subject to the provisions of this title, or is an incorporated municipality which has elected, under the procedure prescribed in this title, to be classified as a noncharter code city and to be governed according to the provisions of this title under one of the optional forms of government provided for noncharter code cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.01.020.]